Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-411
Change of venue; procedure; effect; expenses.

When an order is made transferring a cause for trial, as provided in section 25-410, the clerk of the court must transmit the pleadings and papers therein to the clerk of the court to which it is transferred; and in every such case, all expenses of such trial which would be chargeable to the county in which the suit originated had the cause been tried therein, as determined by the district judge of the county to which said cause has been transferred, shall be a charge upon the county in which the suit was commenced. The court to which an action is transferred shall have and exercise over the same the like jurisdiction as if it had been originally commenced therein.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 3, p. 712;

R.S.1913, § 7622;

C.S.1922, § 8565;

C.S.1929, § 20-411;

Laws 1935, c. 43, § 1, p. 162;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-411;

R.S.1943, § 25-411.